Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.230

Housing finance program—Program elements.

The housing finance program developed under RCW 43.180.220 shall:

(1) Be limited to borrowers with incomes that do not exceed one hundred fifteen percent of the state or county median family income, whichever is higher, adjusted for family size;

(2) Be limited to first-time homebuyers as defined in RCW 43.185A.010;

(3) Be targeted so that priority is given to low-income households as defined in RCW 43.185A.010;

(4) To the extent funds are made available, provide either downpayment or closing costs assistance to households eligible for assistance under chapter 43.185A RCW and this chapter; and

(5) Provide notification to active participants of the state retirement systems managed by the department of retirement systems under chapter 41.50 RCW.

[ 1994 c 235 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1994 c 235: See note following RCW 43.180.220.